Vermont, session 2025-2026, H426.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
* * * Short Title * * *
Sec. 1. SHORT TITLE
This act may be cited as “An Act Relating to Creating a Unified Resilient
Transportation System” or “Curt’s Act.”
* * * Efficient Vehicle Incentive Program Funding * * *
Sec. 2. APPROPRIATIONS FOR VEHICLE INCENTIVE PROGRAMS
(a) The sum of $3,000,000.00 is appropriated from the General Fund to the
Agency of Transportation in fiscal year 2026 for the purpose of funding the
MileageSmart Program established pursuant to 19 V.S.A. § 2902.
(b) The sum of $6,000,000.00 is appropriated from the General Fund to the
Agency of Transportation in fiscal year 2026 for the purpose of funding the
VT LEG #380552 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.426
2025 Page 4 of 45
Incentive Program for New Plug-In Electric Vehicles established pursuant to
19 V.S.A. § 2901.
(c) The sum of $1,000,000.00 is appropriated from the General Fund to the
Agency of Transportation in fiscal year 2026 for the purpose of funding the
Replace Your Ride program established pursuant to 19 V.S.A. § 2904.
(d) The sum of $150,000.00 is appropriated from the General Fund to the
Agency of Transportation in fiscal year 2026 for the purpose of funding the
eBike Incentive Program established pursuant to 2021 Acts and Resolves No.
55, Sec. 28, as amended by 2022 Acts and Resolves No. 184, Sec. 23.
Sec. 3. ONE-TIME PUBLIC TRANSIT MONIES
(a) Project addition. The following project is added to the Agency of
Transportation’s Proposed Fiscal Year 2026 Transportation Program:
Increased One-Time Monies for Public Transit for Fiscal Year 2026.
(b) Authorization. Spending authority for Increased One-Time Monies for
Public Transit for Fiscal Year 2025 is authorized as follows:
FY25 As Proposed As Amended Change
Other $0.00 $2,844,991.00 $2,844,991.00
Total $0.00 $2,844,991.00 $2,844,991.00
Sources of funds
State $0.00 $2,844,991.00 $2,844,991.00
Total $0.00 $2,844,991.00 $2,844,991.00
VT LEG #380552 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.426
2025 Page 5 of 45
(c) Federal monies. The Agency of Transportation shall utilize available
federal monies in lieu of the authorization in subsection (b) of this section to
the greatest extent practicable, provided that there is no negative impact on any
local public transit providers.
(d) Implementation. The Agency shall distribute the authorization in
subsection (b) of this section to local transit agencies as one-time bridge
funding for fiscal year 2026 to ensure that local transit agencies are able to
maintain the existing level of service and make planned capital investments in
fiscal year 2026.
* * * Retail Delivery Fee * * *
Sec. 4. 23 V.S.A. chapter 26 is added to read:
CHAPTER 26. RETAIL DELIVERY FEE
§ 2551. DEFINITIONS
As used in this chapter:
(1) “Commissioner” means the Commissioner of Taxes.
(2) “Persons required to collect tax” has the same meaning as in
32 V.S.A. § 9701.
(3) “Retail delivery” means a delivery of tangible personal property to a
person located in Vermont as part of a retail sale by a vendor. Retail delivery
does not include pickup of tangible personal property at a vendor’s place of
business, including curbside pickup.
VT LEG #380552 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.426
2025 Page 6 of 45
(4) “Tangible personal property” has the same meaning as in 32 V.S.A.
§ 9701, except that it shall not include electricity, water, gas, steam, and
prewritten computer software.
(5) “Vendor” has the same meaning as in 32 V.S.A. § 9701.
§ 2552. FEE ON RETAIL DELIVERIES
(a)(1) All retail deliveries by persons required to collect tax pursuant to
32 V.S.A. chapter 233 shall be subject to a delivery fee of $0.30.
(2) A vendor may elect to collect the fee imposed pursuant to this
section from the purchaser.
(3) For purposes of 32 V.S.A. chapter 233, the delivery fee imposed
pursuant to this section shall not be included in the sales price of the tangible
personal property sold as part of a retail sale and shall be separately stated on
any invoice, bill or sale, or similar document given to the purchaser.
(b) If the vendor collects the delivery fee from the purchaser, the delivery
fee must be charged in addition to any other delivery fee.
(c) The delivery fee imposed pursuant to this section shall only be charged
once per retail transaction regardless of the number of:
(1) items of tangible personal property purchased; or
(2) shipments needed to deliver the items of tangible personal property
purchased.
VT LEG #380552 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.426
2025 Page 7 of 45
(d)(1) The delivery fee imposed pursuant to this section shall be
nonrefundable if any or all items of tangible personal property that were
purchased are returned to the vendor or the vendor provides a refund or credit
in an amount that is equal to or less than the purchase price of the items.
(2) The delivery fee imposed pursuant to this section shall be refunded
to the purchaser if the retail delivery is canceled by the purchaser, vendor, or
the delivery provider.
§ 2553. RETURNS; PAYMENT OF RETAIL DELIVERY FEES
(a) A vendor shall report the amount of fees collected on a return
prescribed by the Commissioner. The return shall include any other
information that the Commissioner deems necessary for the administration of
this chapter.
(b) Returns required pursuant to this section shall be submitted to the
Commissioner on the same schedule as the vendor is required to submit sales
tax returns pursuant to 32 V.S.A. § 9775.
(c) All fees collected by a vendor for the time period covered by a return
shall be remitted to the Commissioner at the same time the vendor submits the
return.
VT LEG #380552 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.426
2025 Page 8 of 45
§ 2554. ADMINISTRATION; OVERPAYMENTS; REFUNDS;
ENFORCEMENT; PENALTIES
The provisions of 32 V.S.A. chapter 233 relating to administration, refunds
of overpayments, enforcement, penalties, and appeals shall apply to this
chapter.
§ 2555. DEPOSIT AND USE OF FEES
Retail delivery fees collected pursuant to this chapter shall be deposited into
the Transportation Fund and used to support the provision of Town Highway
Aid pursuant to 19 V.S.A. § 306(a).
Sec. 5. 19 V.S.A. § 306 is amended to read:
§ 306. APPROPRIATION; STATE AID FOR TOWN HIGHWAYS
(a) General State aid to town highways.
(1) An annual appropriation to class 1, 2, and 3 town highways shall be
made. This appropriation shall increase over the previous fiscal year’s
appropriation pursuant to this subdivision by the same percentage change as
the following, whichever is less, or shall remain at the previous fiscal year’s
appropriation pursuant to this subdivision if either of the following are
negative or zero:
* * *
(3) In addition to the amounts appropriated pursuant to subdivision (1)
of this subsection, the total amount of retail delivery fees collected pursuant to
VT LEG #380552 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.426
2025 Page 9 of 45
chapter 26 of this title for the prior fiscal year shall be included in the amount
appropriated pursuant to this subsection but shall not be counted for purposes
of determining the amount by which the amounts appropriated pursuant to
subdivision (1) shall increase each fiscal year.
(4) The funds appropriated shall be distributed to towns as follows:
* * *
* * * Transit; Active Transportation; Electric Vehicles; Idling; Safe Passing;
Outreach * * *
Sec. 6. PUBLIC TRANSPORTATION; ACTIVE TRANSPORTATION;
ELECTRIC VEHICLES; IDLING; SAFE PASSING; OUTREACH
(a) On or before January 1, 2026, the Agency of Transportation, in
consultation with the Departments of Environmental Conservation and of
Public Safety and with Drive Electric Vermont, shall implement public
outreach campaigns related to public transportation, active transportation,
electric vehicles, idling, and safe passing distances.
(b) The public outreach campaigns shall include, at a minimum,
information related to:
(1) for the public outreach campaign related to public transportation:
(A) ways to access public transportation;
(B) modes of public transportation available; and
VT LEG #380552 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.426
2025 Page 10 of 45
(C) economic and environmental benefits of utilizing public
transportation;
(2) for the public outreach campaign related to active transportation:
(A) forms of active transportation;
(B) methods for utilizing active transportation for commuting and
running errands;
(C) infrastructure and public amenities that are available to facilitate
active transportation; and
(D) economic, environmental, and health benefits of utilizing active
transportation;
(3) for the public outreach campaign related to electric vehicles:
(A) incentive programs for the purchase of electric vehicles and the
installation of electrical vehicle supply equipment that are available through
the State, the federal government, and utilities; and
(B) economic and environmental benefits of utilizing an electric
vehicle for transportation in place of a vehicle with an internal combustion
engine;
(4) for the public outreach campaign related to idling:
(A) the instances when idling violates Vermont law;
(B) the impact of idling on the environment and health;
VT LEG #380552 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.426
2025 Page 11 of 45
(C) the estimated amount of fuel that is wasted each year because of
motor vehicles idling in Vermont and the estimated cost of the wasted fuel;
(D) the estimated savings in fuel and fuel costs that would result from
reducing idling by just one minute per day; and
(E) the estimated reduction in greenhouse gas emissions and air
pollution that would result from reducing idling by just one minute per day;
and
(5) for the public outreach campaign related to safe passing distances:
(A) the requirement in Vermont law to reduce speed and provide at
least four feet of space to vulnerable users when passing; and
(B) information on the potential to reduce accidents, injuries, and
fatalities by following Vermont’s law relating to motor vehicles passing
vulnerable users.
(c) The public outreach campaigns required pursuant to this section shall
disseminate information through email; dedicated web pages that are linked
through the websites for the Departments of Motor Vehicles, of Environmental
Conservation, and of Public Safety; social media platforms; community
posting websites; radio; television; and printed written materials.
VT LEG #380552 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.426
2025 Page 12 of 45
* * * Expansion of PEV and eBike Market * * *
Sec. 7. EXPANSION OF PEV AND EBIKE MARKET
(a)(1) To the extent that federal or State funds are appropriated to support
the provision of incentives for the purchase of PEVs or the installation of
electric vehicle supply equipment (EVSE), the Agency of Transportation shall
renew its contract with Drive Electric Vermont for fiscal year 2026.
(2) In the event that federal or State funds are not appropriated as
described in subdivision (1) of this subsection, to the extent that funds are
available, the Agency of Transportation shall consider contracting with Drive
Electric Vermont to provide educational and outreach services related to the
successful ownership and operation of PEVs.
(b) The sum of $12,000.00 is appropriated from the General Fund to the
Agency of Transportation in fiscal year 2026 to enter into and expand public-
private partnerships with Vermont organizations promoting the use of eBikes
for transportation.
* * * Consideration of Vehicle Miles Traveled in Project Planning * * *
Sec. 8. 19 V.S.A. § 1 is amended to read:
§ 1. DEFINITIONS
As used in this title:
* * *
VT LEG #380552 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.426
2025 Page 13 of 45
(26) “Vehicle miles traveled” means the estimated sum of the miles
traveled by all motor vehicle trips within a specific area during a calendar year.
Sec. 9. 19 V.S.A. § 10b is amended to read:
§ 10b. STATEMENT OF POLICY; GENERAL
(a) The Agency shall be the responsible agency of the State for the
development of transportation policy. It shall develop a mission statement to
reflect:
(1) that State transportation policy shall be to encompass, coordinate,
and integrate all modes of transportation and to consider complete streets, as
defined in section 2401 of this title, principles; and
(2) the need for transportation projects that will improve the State’s
economic infrastructure, as well as the use of; resources in efficient,
coordinated, integrated, cost-effective, and environmentally sound ways,;
reduce vehicle miles traveled within the State; and that will be consistent with
the recommendations of the Comprehensive Energy Plan (CEP) issued under
30 V.S.A. § 202b.
* * *
(c) In developing the State’s annual Transportation Program, the Agency
shall, consistent with the planning goals listed in 24 V.S.A. § 4302 and with
appropriate consideration to local, regional, and State agency plans:
VT LEG #380552 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.426
2025 Page 14 of 45
(1) develop or incorporate designs that provide integrated, safe, and
efficient transportation; that reduce vehicle miles traveled in the State; and that
are consistent with the recommendations of the CEP;
* * *
(d) The Agency of Transportation, in developing each of the program
prioritization systems schedules for all modes of transportation, shall include
the following throughout the process:
* * *
(2) Each year, the Agency shall provide in the front of the
Transportation Program book a detailed explanation describing the factors in
the prioritization system that creates each project list, which shall include a
reduction in vehicle miles traveled in the State.
Sec. 10. 19 V.S.A. § 10c is amended to read:
§ 10c. STATEMENT OF POLICY; HIGHWAYS AND BRIDGES
* * *
(c) In choosing between the improvement of an existing highway and
complete reconstruction, the Agency shall weigh the following factors:
* * *
(9) the impact on the historic, scenic, and aesthetic values of the
municipality, as interpreted by the municipality, in which the highway is
located; and
VT LEG #380552 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.426
2025 Page 15 of 45
(10) if it is a forest highway under federal jurisdiction; and
(11) opportunities to reduce vehicle miles traveled or otherwise reduce
greenhouse gas emissions related to the highway.
* * *
(k) It shall be the policy of the State to develop plans for the improvement
and reconstruction of highways and bridges in a manner that reduces vehicle
miles traveled or otherwise reduces greenhouse gas emissions related to the
highway or bridge.
Sec. 11. 19 V.S.A. § 10i is amended to read:
§ 10i. TRANSPORTATION PLANNING PROCESS
* * *
(c) Transportation Program. The Transportation Program shall be
developed in a fiscally responsible manner to accomplish the following
objectives:
* * *
(3) strengthening the economy, protecting the quality of the natural
environment, and improving Vermonters’ quality of life; and
(4) achieving the recommendations of the CEP; and
(5) reducing vehicle miles traveled or otherwise reducing greenhouse
gas emissions.
* * *
VT LEG #380552 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.426
2025 Page 16 of 45
* * * Increased Highway Funding for Rural Towns * * *
Sec. 12. 19 V.S.A. § 306 is amended to read:
§ 306. APPROPRIATION; STATE AID FOR TOWN HIGHWAYS
* * *
(d) State aid for nonfederal disasters.
(1) There shall be an annual appropriation for emergency aid in
repairing, building, or reconstructing class 1, 2, or 3 town highways and for
repairing or replacing drainage structures including bridges on class 1, 2, 3,
and 4 town highways damaged by natural or man-made disasters. Eligibility
for use of emergency aid under this appropriation shall be subject to the
following criteria:
(1)(A) The Secretary of Transportation shall determine that the disaster
is of such magnitude that State aid is both reasonable and necessary to preserve
the public good. If total cumulative damages to town highways and drainage
structures are less than the value of 10 percent of the town’s overall total
highway budget excluding the town’s winter maintenance budget, the disaster
shall not qualify for assistance under this subsection.
(2)(B) The disaster shall not qualify for major disaster assistance from
the Federal Emergency Management Agency (FEMA) under the Robert T.
Stafford Disaster Relief and Emergency Assistance Act, 42 U.S.C. §§ 5121 et
VT LEG #380552 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.426
2025 Page 17 of 45
seq., or from the Federal Highway Administration (FHWA) under the 23
C.F.R. Part 668 Emergency Relief Program for federal-aid highways.
(C) Additional criteria established by the Secretary through
rulemaking under 3 V.S.A. chapter 25.
(3)(2)(A) Towns Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (B) of this
subdivision (d)(2), towns shall be eligible for reimbursement for repair or
replacement costs of either up to 90 percent of the eligible repair or
replacement costs or the eligible repair or replacement costs, minus an amount
equal to 10 percent of the overall total highway budget, minus the town’s
winter maintenance budget, whichever is greater.
(B) Rural towns, as that term is defined in 24 V.S.A. § 4303, shall be
eligible for reimbursement for repair or replacement costs of either up to 95
percent of the eligible repair or replacement costs or the eligible repair or
replacement costs, minus an amount equal to five percent of the overall total
highway budget, minus the rural town’s winter maintenance budget, whichever
is greater.
(4)(3) For towns that have adopted road and bridge standards, eligibility
for reimbursement for repair or replacement of infrastructure shall be to those
standards. For towns that have not adopted these standards, eligibility for
reimbursement for repair or replacement of infrastructure shall be limited to
the specifications of the infrastructure that preexisted the emergency event;
VT LEG #380552 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.426
2025 Page 18 of 45
however, the repair or replacement shall be to standards approved by the
Agency of Transportation.
(5)(4) For a drainage structure on a class 4 town highway to be eligible
for repair or replacement under this subsection, the town must document that it
maintained the structure prior to the nonfederal disaster.
(6) Such additional criteria as may be adopted by the Agency of
Transportation through rulemaking under 3 V.S.A. chapter 25.
* * *
(f) State aid for federal disasters.
(1) Towns receiving assistance under the Federal Highway
Administration’s Emergency Relief Program for federal-aid highways shall be
eligible for State aid when a nonfederal match is required. Eligibility for aid
under this subsection shall be subject to the following criteria:
(A)(i) Towns Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (ii) of this
subdivision (f)(1)(A), towns shall be responsible for up to not more than 10
percent of the total eligible project costs.
(ii) Rural towns, as that term is defined pursuant to 24 V.S.A.
§ 4303, shall be responsible for not more than five percent of the total eligible
project costs.
* * *
VT LEG #380552 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.426
2025 Page 19 of 45
(C) Such additional Additional criteria as may be adopted established
by the Agency Secretary through rulemaking under 3 V.S.A. chapter 25.
* * *
(i) Municipal Mitigation Assistance Program.
(1) The Agency shall administer the Municipal Mitigation Assistance
Program. Through the Program, the Agency shall provide assistance and
grants to municipalities for environmental mitigation projects related to
stormwater and highways and for the establishment and operation of
stormwater utilities. Municipalities
(2)(A) Except as otherwise provided pursuant to subdivisions (B) and
(C) of this subdivision (i)(2), municipalities shall match grants with local funds
sufficient to cover 20 percent of the project costs, except that the.
(B) Rural towns, as that term is defined pursuant to 24 V.S.A.
§ 4303, shall match grants with local funds sufficient to cover 10 percent of the
project costs.
(C) Notwithstanding subdivisions (A) and (B) of this subdivision
(i)(2), the Agency may issue grants for the establishment or operation of
stormwater utilities without requiring a local match.
(3) From the operating expenses appropriated for the Program, the
Agency is authorized to pay costs billed to the Agency by municipal
stormwater utilities.
VT LEG #380552 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.426
2025 Page 20 of 45
* * *
(k) As used in this section, “town” includes a “rural town” as defined
pursuant to 24 V.S.A. § 4303 unless otherwise expressly provided.
Sec. 13. 19 V.S.A. § 309a is amended to read:
§ 309a. LOCAL HIGHWAY WORK UNIFORM LOCAL SHARE;
EXCEPTIONS
(a) Except as provided in subsection (b) or (c) of this section or in sections
309b and 309c of this title, in any case of highway or bridge construction in
which a federal/State/local or State/local funding match is authorized, the
municipality’s share shall be ten percent of the project costs.
(b) This The provisions of subsection (a) of this section shall not apply to:
* * *
(6) any project where, by the mutual agreement of the municipality and
Agency, rehabilitation of an existing bridge is the preferred alternative, in
which case the Agency shall use the appropriate combination of State and
federal funding to pay either 95 percent of the cost of rehabilitation, or 97.5
percent if the municipality closes the bridge and does not construct a
temporary bridge for the duration of the project; or
(7) any project or portion of a project involving a structure that is part of
the Historic Bridge Program, where the Agency shall use the appropriate
VT LEG #380552 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.426
2025 Page 21 of 45
combination of State and federal funding to pay 100 percent of the cost of
rehabilitation; or
(8) any project in a rural town, as that term is defined pursuant to
24 V.S.A. § 4303, in which case the municipal share shall be 2.5 percent of the
project costs or a lesser amount authorized by statute or the General Assembly.
* * *
Sec. 14. 19 V.S.A. § 309b is amended to read:
§ 309b. LOCAL MATCH; CERTAIN TOWN HIGHWAY PROGRAMS
(a)(1) Notwithstanding subsection 309a(a) of this title and except as
provided in subdivision (2) of this subsection, grants provided to towns under
the Town Highway Structures Program shall be matched by local funds
sufficient to cover 20 percent of the project costs, unless the town has adopted
road and bridge standards, has completed a network inventory, and has
submitted an annual certification of compliance for town road and bridge
standards to the Secretary, in which event the local match shall be sufficient to
cover 10 percent of the project costs.
(2) Grants provided to rural towns, as that term is defined pursuant to
24 V.S.A. § 4303, under the Town Highway Structures Program shall be
matched by local funds sufficient to cover 10 percent of the project costs,
unless the rural town has adopted road and bridge standards, has completed a
network inventory, and has submitted an annual certification of compliance for
VT LEG #380552 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.426
2025 Page 22 of 45
town road and bridge standards to the Secretary, in which event the local
match shall be sufficient to cover 5 percent of the project costs.
(3) The Secretary may adopt rules to implement the Town Highway
Structures Program. Town highway structures projects receiving funds
pursuant to this subsection shall be the responsibility of the applicant
municipality.
(b)(1) Notwithstanding subsection 309a(a) of this title and except as
provided pursuant to subdivision (2) of this subsection, grants provided to
towns under the Class 2 Town Highway Roadway Program shall be matched
by local funds sufficient to cover 30 percent of the project costs, unless the
town has adopted road and bridge standards, has completed a network
inventory, and has submitted an annual certification of compliance for town
road and bridge standards to the Secretary, in which event the local match shall
be sufficient to cover 20 percent of the project costs.
(2) Grants provided to rural towns, as that term is defined pursuant to
24 V.S.A. § 4303, under the Class 2 Town Highway Roadway Program shall
be matched by local funds sufficient to cover 15 percent of the project costs,
unless the rural town has adopted road and bridge standards, has completed a
network inventory, and has submitted an annual certification of compliance for
town road and bridge standards to the Secretary, in which event the local
match shall be sufficient to cover 10 percent of the project costs.
VT LEG #380552 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.426
2025 Page 23 of 45
(3) The Secretary may adopt rules to implement the Class 2 Town
Highway Roadway Program. Class 2 town highway roadway projects
receiving funds pursuant to this subsection shall be the responsibility of the
applicant municipality, and a municipality shall not receive a grant in excess of
$200,000.00.
* * *
* * * Complete Streets * * *
Sec. 15. 19 V.S.A. § 2405 is added to read:
§ 2405. TECHNICAL ASSISTANCE FOR MUNICIPALITIES
The Agency shall provide technical and planning assistance to
municipalities to assist with the incorporation of complete streets principles
into municipal projects and compliance with the provisions of this chapter.
Sec. 16. 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 148, Sec. 31 is amended to read:
Sec. 31. REPLACEMENT FOR THE VERMONT STATE DESIGN
STANDARDS
* * *
(c) The Agency of Transportation shall ensure that the replacement for the
Vermont State Design Standards incorporates provisions addressing the
following:
VT LEG #380552 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.426
2025 Page 24 of 45
(1) prioritization of reducing vehicle miles traveled in downtown and
village centers identified by a regional planning commission pursuant to
24 V.S.A. § 4348a;
(2) alignment of eligible transportation improvements with future land
use in downtown and village centers identified by a regional planning
commission pursuant to 24 V.S.A. § 4348a through the use of transect maps;
(3) context sensitive design standards for downtown and village centers
identified by a regional planning commission pursuant to 24 V.S.A. § 4348a to
ensure that:
(A) standards are compatible with the existing size of the community
and intensity of activity within the community as well as the settlement scale
for the community depicted on future land use maps;
(B) investments are directed to the development of a comprehensive
pedestrian network consistent with existing and future land use; and
(C) design engineering standards provide for ease of understanding
and implementation of:
(i) narrowed travel lanes;
(ii) slow zones for motor vehicle traffic;
(iii) crosswalks;
(iv) enhanced shoulders to accommodate travel by bicycles or
pedestrians, or both;
VT LEG #380552 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.426
2025 Page 25 of 45
(v) sidewalks; and
(vi) public transit services;
(4) identification of standards for reducing vehicle travel lane widths
and other traffic calming methods that can be incorporated by regional
planning commissions into downtown and village centers identified pursuant
to 24 V.S.A. § 4348a;
(5) requirements that reconstructed bridges and upsized culverts within
downtown and village centers identified pursuant to 24 V.S.A. § 4348a shall
incorporate pedestrian facilities; and
(6) consideration of guidance from the Department of Forests, Parks and
Recreation’s Vermont Urban and Community Forestry Program Green Streets
Guide into the design of State highways in downtown and village centers.
* * * National Historic Preservation Act Review; Report * * *
Sec. 17. AMENDMENTS TO AGREEMENT RELATED TO REVIEW
UNDER THE NATIONAL HISTORIC PRESERVATION ACT
(a) The Agency of Transportation, in consultation with the Vermont State
Historic Preservation Officer and the Advisory Council on Historic
Preservation, shall seek to amend the Programmatic Agreement Among the
Federal Highway Administration, the Vermont State Historic Preservation
Officer, the Advisory Council on Historic Preservation, and the Vermont
Agency of Transportation Regarding the Federal-Aid Highway Program in
VT LEG #380552 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.426
2025 Page 26 of 45
Vermont to categorize the creation of new bicycle and pedestrian facilities as
either exempt activities, listed in Appendix A, or screened activities, listed in
Appendix B.
(b) The Agency of Transportation shall provide a written update on its
efforts pursuant to subsection (a) of this section to the House and Senate
Committees on Transportation not later than November 15, 2025.
* * * Local Speed Limits * * *
Sec. 18. 23 V.S.A. § 1007 is amended to read:
§ 1007. LOCAL SPEED LIMITS
(a)(1) The legislative body of a municipality may establish, on the basis of
an engineering and traffic investigation, a speed limit on all or a part of any
city, town, or village highway within its jurisdiction, which:
(A) is not more than 50 miles per hour; however, after considering
neighborhood character, abutting land use, bicycle and pedestrian use, and
physical characteristics of the highways, the legislative body of a municipality
may vote to set the maximum speed limit, without an engineering and traffic
investigation, at is not more than 50 miles per hour nor less than 35 miles per
hour, on all or a portion of unpaved town highways within its boundaries,
unless otherwise posted in accordance with the provisions of this section; or
(B) is not less than 25 miles per hour.
* * *
VT LEG #380552 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.426
2025 Page 27 of 45
(b) The legislative body of a city may establish, on the basis of an
engineering and traffic investigation, a speed limit on all or a part of any State
highway, other than a limited access highway, within its jurisdiction, which:
(1) that is not more than 50 miles per hour; or
(2) is not nor less than 25 miles per hour.
* * *
(e) Lack of evidence of a traffic and engineering study will not invalidate a
local speed limit ordinance as adopted or amended under this section after five
years following the day on which the speed limit ordinance took effect.
[Repealed.]
(f) Notwithstanding the procedure outlined in this section for enacting a
local speed limit, a town or village may adopt a local speed ordinance on a
State highway, other than on limited access highways, provided the ordinance
duplicates the speed limit established under section 1003 of this title.
(g) Notwithstanding any requirements of section 1025 of this title,
downtown development districts, village centers, and new town center
development districts designated under 24 V.S.A. chapter 76A may have
posted speed limits of less than 25 miles per hour.
* * * Regional Planning Commissions * * *
VT LEG #380552 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.426
2025 Page 28 of 45
Sec. 19. 24 V.S.A. § 4345a is amended to read:
§ 4345a. DUTIES OF REGIONAL PLANNING COMMISSIONS
A regional planning commission created under this chapter shall:
* * *
(21) Coordinate regional transportation projects with affected
municipalities to enhance transportation resilience and implementation of the
Climate Action Plan adopted pursuant to 10 V.S.A. § 5902.
* * * Electrical Vehicle Supply Equipment * * *
Sec. 20. 9 V.S.A. § 4468b is added to read:
§ 4468b. ELECTRIC VEHICLE SUPPLY EQUIPMENT
(a) As used in this section:
(1) “Electric vehicle supply equipment (EVSE)” means a device or
system designed and used specifically to transfer electrical energy to a plug-in
electric vehicle.
(2) “EVSE time-of-use (TOU) meter” means an electric meter supplied
and installed by an electric distribution utility that is separate from, and in
addition to, any other electric meter and is devoted exclusively to the charging
of plug-in electric vehicles and that tracks the TOU when charging occurs. An
EVSE TOU meter includes any wiring or conduit necessary to connect the
meter to an EVSE, regardless of whether it is supplied or installed by an
electric utility.
VT LEG #380552 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.426
2025 Page 29 of 45
(b) For any rental agreement executed, extended, or renewed on and after
January 1, 2026, a landlord shall approve a written request of a tenant to install
EVSE at a parking space allotted for the tenant that meets the requirements of
this section and complies with the landlord’s procedural approval process for
modification to the property.
(c) This section does not apply to residential rental properties where:
(1) EVSE already exist for tenants in a ratio that is equal to or greater
than 10 percent of the designated parking spaces;
(2) parking is not provided as part of the lease agreement; or
(3) there are fewer than five parking spaces.
(d) A landlord shall not be obligated to provide an additional parking space
to a tenant in order to accommodate EVSE.
(e) If the EVSE has the effect of providing the tenant with a reserved
parking space, the landlord may charge a monthly rental amount for that
parking space.
(f) The EVSE or EVSE TOU meter, or both, and all modifications and
improvements to the property shall comply with federal, State, and local law,
and all applicable zoning requirements, land use requirements, and covenants,
conditions, and restrictions.
VT LEG #380552 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.426
2025 Page 30 of 45
(g) A tenant’s written request to make a modification to the property in
order to install and use EVSE shall include the tenant’s consent to enter into a
written agreement that includes the following:
(1) Compliance with the landlord’s requirements for the installation,
use, maintenance, and removal of the EVSE or both the EVSE and EVSE TOU
meter and installation, use, and maintenance of the infrastructure for the EVSE
or both the EVSE and EVSE TOU meter.
(2) Compliance with the landlord’s requirements for the tenant to
provide a complete financial analysis and scope of work regarding the
installation of the EVSE or both the EVSE and EVSE TOU meter and its
infrastructure.
(3) Obligation of the tenant to pay the landlord all costs associated with
the landlord’s installation of the EVSE or both the EVSE and EVSE TOU
meter and related infrastructure prior to any modification or improvement
being made to the leased property. The costs associated with modifications
and improvements shall include the cost of permits, supervision, construction,
and, solely if required by the contractor and consistent with its past
performance of work for the landlord, performance bonds.
(4) Obligation of the tenant to pay as part of rent for the costs associated
with the electrical usage, whether or not through an EVSE TOU meter, of the
EVSE; and costs for damage, maintenance, repair, removal, and replacement
VT LEG #380552 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.426
2025 Page 31 of 45
of the EVSE or both the EVSE and EVSE TOU meter; and modifications or
improvements made to the property associated with the EVSE or both the
EVSE and EVSE TOU meter.
(h) The tenant and each successor tenant shall obtain personal liability
coverage in an amount not to exceed 10 times the annual rent charged for the
dwelling unit covering property damage and personal injury proximately
caused by the installation or operation of the EVSE or both the EVSE and
EVSE TOU meter. The policy shall be maintained in full force and effect from
the time of installation of the EVSE or both the EVSE and EVSE TOU meter
until the EVSE or the EVSE and EVSE TOU meter is removed or the tenant
forfeits possession of the dwelling unit to the landlord.
(i) Notwithstanding subsection (h) of this section, no insurance shall be
required of a tenant installing an EVSE or both an EVSE and EVSE TOU
meter if the following are satisfied:
(1) the EVSE has been certified by a Nationally Recognized Testing
Laboratory that is approved by the Occupational Safety and Health
Administration of the U.S. Department of Labor; and
(2) the EVSE and any associated alterations to the dwelling’s electrical
system are performed by a licensed electrician and the EVSE TOU meter, if
applicable, is installed by the electric distribution utility providing service.
VT LEG #380552 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.426
2025 Page 32 of 45
(j) A landlord that intentionally violates this section shall be liable to the
tenant or other party for actual damages and shall pay a civil penalty to the
tenant or other party in an amount not to exceed $1,000.00.
(k) In any action by a tenant requesting to have an EVSE installed and
seeking to enforce compliance with this section, the prevailing plaintiff shall
be awarded reasonable attorney’s fees.
Sec. 21. 27A V.S.A. § 1-204 is amended to read:
§ 1-204. PREEXISTING COMMON INTEREST COMMUNITIES
(a)(1) Unless excepted under section 1-203 of this title, the following
sections and subdivisions of this title apply to a common interest community
created in this State before January 1, 1999: sections 1-103, 1-105, 1-106, 1-
107, 2-103, 2-104, and 2-121, subdivisions 3-102(a)(1) through (6) and (11)
through (16), and sections 3-111, 3-116, 3-118, 4-109, and 4-117 to the extent
necessary to construe the applicable sections. The sections and subdivisions
described in this subdivision apply only to events and circumstances occurring
after December 31, 1998 and do not invalidate existing provisions of the
declarations, bylaws, plats, or plans of those common interest communities.
* * *
(3) Unless excepted under section 1-203 of this title, section 3-125 of
this title shall apply to a common interest community created in this State
before January 1, 1999. Section 3-125 applies only to events and
VT LEG #380552 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.426
2025 Page 33 of 45
circumstances occurring after June 30, 2025 and does not invalidate existing
provisions of the declarations, bylaws, plats, or plans of those common interest
communities.
* * *
Sec. 22. 27A V.S.A. § 3-125 is added to read:
§ 3-125. ELECTRIC VEHICLE SUPPLY EQUIPMENT
(a) Definitions. As used in this section:
(1) “Electric vehicle supply equipment (EVSE)” means a device or
system designed and used specifically to transfer electrical energy to a plug-in
electric vehicle.
(2) “EVSE owner” means the unit owner who applies to install an EVSE
and each successive unit owner associated with the initial application to install
the EVSE unless there is a specific change in ownership of the EVSE, in which
case the EVSE owner shall be the owner specified in a conveying document
memorializing the change in ownership of the EVSE.
(3) “EVSE time-of-use (TOU) meter” means an electric meter supplied
and installed by an electric distribution utility that is separate from, and in
addition to, any other electric meter and is devoted exclusively to the charging
of plug-in electric vehicles and that tracks the TOU when charging occurs. An
EVSE TOU meter includes any wiring or conduit necessary to connect the
VT LEG #380552 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.426
2025 Page 34 of 45
meter to an EVSE, regardless of whether it is supplied or installed by an
electric utility.
(4) “Plug-in electric vehicles” has the same meaning as in 23 V.S.A.
§ 4(85).
(5) “Reasonable restrictions” are restrictions that do not significantly
increase the cost of the EVSE or EVSE TOU meter, or both, or significantly
decrease the efficiency or specified performance of the EVSE or EVSE TOU
meter, or both.
(b) Protected uses.
(1) Any covenant, restriction, or condition contained in any deed,
contract, security instrument, or other instrument affecting the transfer or sale
of any interest in a common interest community, and any provision of a
governing document associated with a common interest community, such as a
declaration or bylaws, that either effectively prohibits or unreasonably restricts
the installation or use of EVSE or an EVSE TOU meter, or both, within a unit
owner’s unit or in a designated parking space, including a deeded parking
space, a parking space in a unit owner’s exclusive use common element, or a
parking space that is specifically designated for use by a particular unit owner,
or is in conflict with this section is void and unenforceable.
(2) This subsection (b) shall not apply to provisions that impose
reasonable restrictions on EVSE or EVSE TOU meters, or both. However, it is
VT LEG #380552 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.426
2025 Page 35 of 45
the policy of the State to promote, encourage, and remove obstacles to the use
of plug-in electric vehicles, including access to EVSE at home.
(3) The EVSE or EVSE TOU meter, or both, and all modifications and
improvements to the common interest community shall comply with federal,
State, and local law, and all applicable zoning requirements, land use
requirements, and covenants, conditions, and restrictions.
(4) If approval is required for the installation or use of EVSE or EVSE
TOU meters, or both, the application for approval shall be processed and
approved by the association in the same manner as an application for approval
of an architectural modification to the common interest community and shall
not be intentionally avoided or delayed. The approval or denial of an
application shall be in writing. If an application is not denied in writing within
60 days from the date of receipt of the application, the application shall be
deemed approved, unless that delay is the result of a reasonable request for
additional information.
(5) If the EVSE or EVSE TOU meter, or both, is to be placed in a
common element or a limited common element, as designated in the common
interest community’s declaration, the following provisions apply:
(A) The unit owner first shall obtain approval from the association to
install the EVSE or EVSE TOU meter, or both, and the association shall
VT LEG #380552 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.426
2025 Page 36 of 45
approve the installation if the unit owner agrees in writing to do all of the
following:
(i) comply with the association’s architectural standards for the
installation of the EVSE or EVSE TOU meter, or both;
(ii) engage a licensed contractor to install the EVSE and, if
necessary, to install wiring or conduit necessary to connect the EVSE to an
EVSE TOU meter;
(iii) engage the electric distribution utility providing service to
install the EVSE TOU meter, if applicable;
(iv) provide a certificate of insurance that names the association as
an additional insured under the unit owner’s insurance policy within 14 days
after approval; and
(v) pay for both the costs associated with the installation of the
EVSE or both the EVSE and EVSE TOU meter and the electricity usage
associated with the EVSE.
(B) The unit owner and each successive owner of the EVSE or both
the EVSE and EVSE TOU meter shall be responsible for all of the following:
(i) costs for damage to the EVSE or EVSE TOU meter, or both; a
common element; or a limited common element resulting from the installation,
maintenance, repair, removal, or replacement of the EVSE or EVSE TOU
meter, or both;
VT LEG #380552 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.426
2025 Page 37 of 45
(ii) costs for the maintenance, repair, and replacement of the
EVSE or EVSE TOU meter, or both, until the EVSE has been removed and for
the restoration of the common element or limited common element after
removal;
(iii) cost of electricity associated with the EVSE; and
(iv) disclosing to prospective buyers of the unit the existence of
any EVSE or EVSE TOU meters, or both, and the related responsibilities of
the unit owner under this section.
(C) The owner of EVSE, whether the EVSE is located within a unit
or within a common element or a limited common element, shall, at all times,
maintain a liability coverage policy that names the association as an additional
insured. The unit owner that submitted the application to install the EVSE or
EVSE TOU meter, or both, shall provide the association with the
corresponding certificate of insurance within 14 days following approval of the
application. That unit owner and each successor EVSE owner shall annually
provide the association with the certificate of insurance.
(D) An EVSE owner shall not be required to maintain a homeowner
liability coverage policy for an existing National Electrical Manufacturers
Association standard alternating current power plug.
(6) Installation of EVSE or both EVSE and an EVSE TOU meter for the
exclusive use of a unit owner in a common element or limited common
VT LEG #380552 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.426
2025 Page 38 of 45
element shall be authorized by the association only if installation in the unit
owner’s unit or designated parking space is impossible or unreasonably
expensive. In such cases, the association shall enter into a license agreement
with the unit owner for the use of the space in a common element or limited
common element and the unit owner shall comply with all of the requirements
in subdivision (5) of this subsection.
(7) The association may install EVSE or both EVSE and an EVSE TOU
meter in the common element or limited common element for the use of all
unit owners in the association and, in that case, the association shall develop
appropriate terms of use for the EVSE.
(8) Subject to subdivision (3) of this subsection, an association may
create a new parking space where one did not previously exist to facilitate the
installation of an EVSE.
(9) An association that intentionally violates this subsection shall be
liable to the applicant unit owner or other party for actual damages and shall
pay a civil penalty to the applicant unit owner or other party in an amount not
to exceed $1,000.00.
(10) In any action by a unit owner requesting to have an EVSE installed
and seeking to enforce compliance with this section, the prevailing plaintiff
shall be awarded reasonable attorney’s fees.
VT LEG #380552 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.426
2025 Page 39 of 45
Sec. 23. 19 V.S.A. § 2908 is added to read:
§ 2908. PUBLIC EVSE; REQUIRED FORMS OF PAYMENT
All EVSE available to the public that requires payment for use shall accept
credit cards for payment of all applicable charges and fees in addition to any
other form of payment accepted by the EVSE.
* * * State Rights-of-Way * * *
Sec. 24. USE OF STATE-OWNED RIGHTS-OF-WAY; REVENUE
GENERATION; PARKING; EVSE
(a)(1) The Secretary of Transportation shall develop a comprehensive map
of utilities located within State-owned rights-of-way in Vermont and determine
whether the State is receiving compensation for the location of utilities within
State-owned right-of-way.
(2) The Secretary of Transportation shall develop a plan for the State to
begin receiving compensation for the ongoing location of utilities within State-
owned rights-of-way and for increasing the amount of compensation received
in relation to utilities located in State-owned right-of-way for which the State
is already receiving compensation.
(3) On or before January 15, 2026, the Secretary shall submit a written
report detailing the Secretary’s findings pursuant to subdivision (1) of this
subsection and plan pursuant to subdivision (2) of this subsection to the House
VT LEG #380552 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.426
2025 Page 40 of 45
and Senate Committees on Transportation, the House Committee on Ways and
Means, and the Senate Committee on Finance.
(b)(1) The Agency of Transportation shall, if adequate space exists within a
State-owned right-of-way that is located within a downtown and village center
identified by the regional planning commission pursuant to 24 V.S.A. § 4348a,
permit the creation of on-street parking within that right-of-way.
(2) The Agency of Transportation shall identify locations for the
colocation of electrical vehicle supply equipment and on-street parking for all
State-owned rights-of-way that are:
(A) located within a downtown and village center identified by a
regional planning commission pursuant to 24 V.S.A. § 4348a;
(B) either have existing on-street parking or are sufficiently wide to
accommodate on-street parking; and
(C) have three-phase power located within or adjacent to the State-
owned right-of-way.
* * * Bicycles * * *
Sec. 25. 23 V.S.A. § 1139 is amended to read:
§ 1139. RIDING ON ROADWAYS AND BICYCLE PATHS
(a) A person Due care and riding on the right. An individual operating a
bicycle upon a roadway shall exercise due care when passing a standing
vehicle or one proceeding in the same direction. Bicyclists generally shall ride
VT LEG #380552 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.426
2025 Page 41 of 45
as near to the right side of the improved area of the highway right-of-way as is
safe, except that a bicyclist:
(1) Shall ride to the left or in a left lane when:
(A) preparing for a left turn at an intersection or into a private
roadway or driveway;
(B) approaching an intersection with a right-turn lane if not turning
right at the intersection; or
(C) overtaking another vulnerable user.
(2) May ride to the left or in a left lane when taking reasonably
necessary precautions to avoid hazards or road conditions. Examples include
objects on the road, parked or moving vehicles, pedestrians, animals, surface
conditions that may impair the bicyclist’s stability, or safety hazards caused by
a narrow road or steep embankment, road geometry, or unfavorable
atmospheric conditions.
(b) Persons riding Riding two abreast. Individuals operating bicycles upon
a roadway may not ride more than two abreast except on paths or parts of
roadways set aside for the exclusive use of bicycles or except as otherwise
permitted by the Commissioner of Public Safety in connection with a public
sporting event in which case the Commissioner shall be authorized to adopt
such rules as the public good requires. Persons Individuals riding two abreast
VT LEG #380552 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.426
2025 Page 42 of 45
shall not impede the normal and reasonable movement of traffic and, on a
laned roadway, shall ride within a single lane.
(c) Obedience to traffic-control devices and traffic-control signals. An
individual operating a bicycle shall follow all traffic-control devices and
traffic-control signals governing motor vehicles with the following exceptions:
(1) Stop sign or flashing red signal.
(A) An individual operating a bicycle approaching a stop sign or a
traffic-control signal where a red lens is illuminated with rapid intermittent
flashes shall:
(i) slow down;
(ii) if required to avoid an immediate hazard, stop pursuant to
subsection 1048(b) of this title; and
(iii) yield the right-of-way to any vehicle in the intersection or
approaching on another intersecting highway so closely as to constitute an
immediate hazard during the time the bicyclist will be within the intersection.
(B) If an individual operating a bicycle meets the requirements of
subdivision (A) of this subdivision (c)(1), the individual may cautiously make
a turn or proceed through the intersection without stopping.
(2) Pedestrian-control devices and pedestrian-control signals. An
individual operating a bicycle while crossing an intersection may follow
pedestrian-control devices and pedestrian-control signals when present except
VT LEG #380552 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.426
2025 Page 43 of 45
where otherwise indicated by traffic-control devices and traffic-control signals
and provided that the bicyclist shall yield to pedestrians in the crosswalk.
(d) Riding on a partially controlled access highway. Bicycles may be
operated on the shoulders of partially controlled access highways, which are
those highways where access is controlled by public authority but where there
are some connections with selected public highways, some crossings at grade,
and some private driveway connections. The Traffic Committee may
determine that any portion of these highways is unsafe and therefore closed to
bicycle operation.
* * * Municipal Resiliency Funding and Assistance * * *
Sec. 26. MUNICIPAL HIGHWAY AND STORMWATER MITIGATION
PROGRAM; ADDITIONAL FUNDING
The sum of $7,143,000.00 is appropriated from the Transportation Fund to
the Municipal Highway and Stormwater Mitigation Program in fiscal year
2026 to support the provision of additional grants for projects designed to
improve flood resiliency, including culvert resizing, culvert replacement, and
stormwater management.
* * * Education Transportation * * *
Sec. 27. EDUCATION TRANSPORTATION COST; STUDY; REPORT
(a) The Secretary of Transportation, in consultation with the Secretary of
Education, school districts, and supervisory unions, shall examine the actual
VT LEG #380552 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.426
2025 Page 44 of 45
costs and the cost-efficiency of providing school-related transportation to
Vermont public school students.
(b) The Secretary of Transportation shall specifically examine:
(1) to the extent data is available, the total cost, the cost per mile, the
cost per passenger, and the cost per passenger mile for school-related
transportation on a district or supervisory union basis, as well as on a regional
and statewide basis;
(2) if data related to the information required under subdivision (1) of
this subsection is not available, the Secretary shall select three school districts
or supervisory unions that are diverse with respect to their location, size, and
population density and determine the total cost, the cost per mile, the cost per
passenger, and the cost per passenger mile of the school-related transportation
provided in each of the districts or supervisory unions;
(3) potential opportunities to utilize public transit to reduce the total
cost, the cost per mile, the cost per passenger, and the cost per passenger mile
of education-related transportation in Vermont;
(4) potential issues that could prevent the utilization of public transit to
reduce the cost of education-related transportation in Vermont, including
restrictions on federal funding, capital expenses, and requirements of State or
federal law; and
VT LEG #380552 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.426
2025 Page 45 of 45
(5) anticipated advantages and disadvantages of utilizing public transit
to reduce the cost of education-related transportation in Vermont.
(c) On or before January 15, 2026, the Secretary of Transportation shall
submit a written report to the House and Senate Committees on Education and
on Transportation regarding the Secretary’s findings pursuant to subsection (b)
of this section and any recommendations for legislative action.
* * * First-Time Car Buyer Workshops * * *
Sec. 28. FIRST-TIME CAR BUYER WORKSHOPS
The sum of $15,000.00 is appropriated to the Agency of Transportation for
the provision, in cooperation with community action agencies, of first-time car
buyer workshops to educate new Americans and disadvantaged Vermonters
about the process for buying a motor vehicle and incentives that are available
to assist with the purchase of a motor vehicle.
* * * Effective Date * * *
Sec. 29. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on passage.
VT LEG #380552 v.2